Georgia statutes. TITLE 35 Law Enforcement Officers and Agencies
CHAPTER 2 Department of Public Safety

Cross references.

Designation of Public Safety Week, §

1-4-25

.

Powers and duties of the Department of Driver Services with regard to drivers’ licenses, T. 40, C. 5.

Juvenile traffic offenses, Uniform Rules for the Juvenile Court of Georgia, Rule 13.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Rules of general applicability, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Public Safety, Chapter 570.